Nebraska, session 109, LB1243.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1243 LB1243
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 79-2,136, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
79-2,136 (1) Each school board shall allow the part-time enrollment
of students, for all courses selected by the students, who are residents
of, or admitted to, the school district pursuant to subsection (1), (2),
or (11) of section 79-215 and who are also enrolled in a private,
denominational, or parochial school or in a school which elects pursuant
to section 79-1601 not to meet accreditation or approval requirements and
shall establish policies and procedures for such part-time enrollment.
Such policies and procedures may include provisions permitting the part-
time enrollment of such students who are not residents of, or admitted
to, such school districts to the extent permitted pursuant to section
79-215 and may require part-time students to follow school policies that
apply to other students at any time the part-time student is present on
school grounds or at a school-sponsored activity or athletic event. Part-
time enrollment shall not entitle a student to transportation or
transportation reimbursements pursuant to section 79-611.
(2) Each school board shall establish policies and procedures to
allow any student who is a resident of, or admitted to, the school
district pursuant to subsection (1), (2), or (11) of section 79-215 and
who is enrolled in a school which elects pursuant to section 79-1601 not
to meet accreditation or approval requirements to participate in any
extracurricular activities as defined in section 79-2,126, including, but
not limited to, interschool competitions, to the same extent and subject
to the same requirements, conditions, and procedures as a student
enrolled in a public school governed by such board, except that any
school which elects pursuant to section 79-1601 not to meet accreditation
or approval requirements shall set the standards for satisfactory
academic performance for a student from the school to participate in
extracurricular activities pursuant to this subsection and shall provide
assurances of compliance with such academic standards.
-2-

LB1243 LB1243
2026 2026
(3) School board policies and procedures adopted pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section:
(a) Shall shall require any student desiring to participate in
extracurricular activities regulated by an athletics or activities
association to which such school is a member pursuant to such subsection
to be enrolled in five credit hours offered by the school district in any
semester in order to participate in such extracurricular activities, but
may not prohibit a student from enrolling in more than five credit
hours; ,
(b) Shall not require any student desiring to participate in an
extracurricular activity that is not regulated by an athletics or
activities association to be enrolled in any minimum number of credit
hours offered by the school district in order to participate in such
extracurricular activity;
(c) Shall shall not allow any preference in the selection of a
student for participation in an extracurricular activity based on such
student's status as a full-time student in the school district; , and
(d) May (c) may require any student participating in extracurricular
activities pursuant to such subsection to follow school policies that
apply to other students when present on school grounds or at a school-
sponsored activity or athletic event.
(4) Participation in extracurricular activities pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section shall not entitle a student to
transportation, except to and from practices and events to the same
extent as public school students participating in such activities, or
transportation reimbursement pursuant to section 79-611.
(5) (4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to exempt any
student from the compulsory attendance provisions of section 79-201 or
any statutes relating to habitual truancy.
Sec. 2. Original section 79-2,136, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, is repealed.
-3-